District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.73

Rulemaking.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to carry out the purposes and functions of this part.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-266, § 14, 48 DCR 1240